Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 32. Department of Administration and Information
§ 9-2-3206.
Personnel hearings.

Each personnel appeal hearing shall be conducted by a presiding officer. Pursuant to rules adopted by the administrator of the personnel division, the parties to a personnel appeal shall submit the name of a presiding officer as mutually agreed to. If the parties fail to submit a name within the time allowed, or if that person is, at any time, unable or unwilling to serve, the administrator shall immediately refer the matter to the office of administrative hearings. A hearing officer from the office of administrative hearings may be peremptorily disqualified from acting in a case by the filing of a motion by either party within ten (10) days of receipt of notice of the assignment of that hearing officer. In any matter, a party may exercise the peremptory disqualification only one (1) time and against only one (1) hearing officer. Either party may seek to disqualify any hearing officer for cause as provided in the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure. The presiding officer shall conduct an impartial contested case hearing in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. A state employee serving as a presiding officer shall not receive a fee for his service but shall be considered engaged in the performance of the duties of his position and shall receive his salary and reimbursement for expenses as provided for state employees. If the presiding officer is from the office of administrative hearings, that office shall be paid at the rate established by that office for services of its hearing officers. The fee received by a presiding officer who is not an employee of the state shall be paid at the same rate established by the office of administrative hearings for services of its hearing officers. The expense of the hearing shall be charged to and borne by the state agency in which the complainant was employed. The presiding officer’s authority shall be limited to the following:

To conduct hearings in accordance with W.S. 16-3-112(b)(i) through (vii) of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and the personnel rules of the executive branch of the state;

To determine if the agency complied with relevant procedural requirements of the personnel rules of the executive branch of the state of Wyoming. Any error or defect in the proceedings which does not affect the substantial rights of either of the parties may be disregarded;

To determine, based upon the evidence presented at the hearing, whether the agency established facts by a preponderance of the evidence constituting good cause for the personnel action, in which event the action shall be affirmed, or whether the facts established by the agency do not constitute good cause for the personnel action, in which event the action shall be reversed.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 197, § 2.

The decision of a presiding officer under subsection (a) of this section constitutes the final agency action, but any party, including the state of Wyoming, aggrieved by a decision of a presiding officer may seek judicial review of that decision in the district court pursuant to W.S.

16-3-114

. The district court or supreme court may award reasonable attorney fees and costs to the prevailing party.

Upon reversal of a personnel action, the agency shall retain authority to take other management actions, as recommended by the presiding officer, including less severe personnel action, based upon the facts found at the hearing.

through (h) Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 55, § 2.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:71; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2023; Laws 1979, ch. 138, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 197, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 15, § 321(o); 1997, ch. 88, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2000, ch. 39, § 1; 2007, ch. 37, § 1; 2012, ch. 96, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1019

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 55, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “department,” see § 9-2-1002(a)(ii).

As to appointment of director and division administrators, see §

9-2-1003

.

As to meal, lodging and traveling expenses of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-102

.

As to transportation expenses of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-103

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “two (2) legislative” in (e); and added (h).

The 2012 amendment,

in (e), substituted “six (6)” for “five (5)”, added the present fifth sentence, and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2012, ch. 96, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, repealed former (e), which read, “The state employee compensation commission is created to review issues related to employee compensation. The commission shall consist of not more than six (6) members to serve two (2) year terms. Three (3) members shall be appointed by the management council of the legislature of whom one (1) shall be from the private sector, and one (1) each from the senate and house of representatives. Two (2) members shall be appointed by the governor, of whom one (1) shall be from the private sector. One (1) member shall be appointed by the chief justice of the Wyoming supreme court but shall be a nonvoting member. The commission shall elect a chairman from among its two (2) legislative members”; repealed former (f), which read, “Members who are not legislators or state employees shall receive per diem and travel expenses in the same manner and amount provided under W.S.

28-5-101

”; repealed former (g), which read, “The commission shall meet at the call of the governor, or the chairman, and shall review personnel related issues including, but not limited to: (i) Decisions relevant to market-based compensation; (ii) Proper recognition and appreciation of employees; (iii) Review of personnel rules and regulations; (iv) Proper manager to employee ratios”; and repealed former (h), which read, “The commission: (i) Shall function as a liaison between the legislature and the governor and executive branch agencies on matters concerning state employee personnel policies provided in subsection (g) of this section; (ii) May hold public hearings regarding any of its duties; (iii) May make and enter into contracts necessary or incidental to carry out any of its duties; (iv) May recommend legislation on matters concerning state employee personnel issues. Any recommendations from the commission shall be submitted to the management council of the legislature; (v) Shall appear before the joint appropriations committee as requested by the committee to present recommendations submitted by the commission pursuant to W.S. 9-2-1012(g).”

Proper standard applied.—

Office of Administrative Hearings (OAH) applied the proper standard in finding that the Department of Family Services (DFS) lacked cause to dismiss the employee, who had no intent to defraud DFS; the employee was a 25-year employee of DFS, she was caring for her three grandchildren during the incarceration of her pregnant, alcoholic daughter, the employee was entitled to DFS child care benefits, but made mistakes in signing daycare logs, and when she discovered that she was overpaid, she immediately paid the money back. Lietz v. State ex rel. Dep't of Family Servs., 2018 WY 127, 430 P.3d 310,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2018).

Jurisdiction.—

District court
properly affirmed the findings by the Office of Administrative Hearings
(OAH) upholding a public employee's suspensions and termination because
there was no indication in the record that she raised the issue of
procedural due process at any time during the OAH proceedings, she
was given prior notice, an opportunity to respond, and a full name-clearing
hearing, OAH had subject matter jurisdiction over the question of
whether the employer followed the personnel rules, and the property
and liberty interests asserted by the employee did not support a due
process claim “of such a fundamental nature that it had to
be considered” for the first time on appeal. Crofts v. State ex rel. Dep't of Game & Fish, 2016 WY 4, 367 P.3d 619,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2016), reh'g denied,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. Feb. 9, 2016).

Governor not liable for refusal to appoint review board replacements. —

The governor's determination that he has no authority to appoint replacements on the personnel review board is within his adjudicative capacity, which absolutely immunizes him from federal civil rights liability. Johnston v. Herschler, 669 F.2d 617, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 22484 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Glover v. State, 860 P.2d 1169,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1993); Wagoner v. State, Dep't of Admin. & Info., 924 P.2d 88,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1996); Brockman v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs., 342 F.3d 1159,

2003 U.S. App. LEXIS 18370

(10th Cir. 2003).

§ 9-2-3207.
Duties of department performed through human resources division.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the department through the human resources division shall:

Establish and administer a personnel classification schedule covering all agency employees, classifying positions into categories determined by similarity of duties, authority, responsibilities and other relevant factors of employment;

Establish and administer a consistent, equitable and flexible compensation plan covering all agency employees;

Supervise employer-employee benefit plans not otherwise provided for by law;

Maintain an information roster on each employee of the state specifying employee name, employing agency, position classification, rate of compensation, job title, position description and service tenure. The information shall be available for inspection only as provided by the Public Records Act;

Maintain a register of applications made by all persons seeking employment with an agency. Each application shall be rated on the basis of suitability and qualifications without regard to political affiliation, race, color, sex, creed or age;

Initiate and administer recruitment programs designed to attract a sufficient quantity of suitable and qualified employees to the service of the state as needed to fulfill service commitments to its citizens;

Approve all in-service or staff development programs available through agencies or sponsored by the department;

Approve all agencies’ changes related to personnel with respect to compensation, position classification, transfers, job titles, position specifications and leave time;

Subject to subsection (g) of this section, establish personnel standards governing employee leave time, hours of work, attendance, grievances and terminations;

With the cooperation and assistance of the division of economic analysis, collect and maintain statistical information related to personnel administration from agencies;

Promulgate reasonable rules:

Which are necessary to administer the classification plan and the compensation plan;

Governing minimum hours of work, attendance regulations, leaves of absence for employees, vacations and the order and manner in which layoffs shall be made;

Concerning recruiting, transfers, discipline, grievances and appeals;

Necessary to administer a program whereby employees may share positions as set forth in subsection (f) of this section;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 129, § 2.

Necessary to administer a program whereby at-will contract employees may be utilized by agencies to meet programmatic needs. These rules shall be structured so that:

At-will contract employees receive benefits limited to coverage and employer contributions as required by law for social security, worker’s compensation, unemployment compensation and group insurance benefits as provided in subdivision (III) of this subparagraph and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (IV) of this subparagraph;

The minimum benefits or rights specifically required under any federal law are provided. In determining the minimum benefits or rights provided under federal law, the rules shall require employment contracts under this subparagraph to be structured so as to exempt at-will contract employees from coverage to the greatest extent possible;

Except as provided in this subdivision and in subdivision (IV) of this subparagraph, no at-will contract employees shall be eligible for or accrue any type of leave or be eligible to participate in or otherwise be covered by state employees’ and officials’ group insurance, the state retirement system or the deferred compensation program. If the employment contract so provides, an at-will contract employee may be eligible for membership in the state employees’ and officials’ group insurance plan in accordance with W.S.

9-3-207

, or in the case of the Wyoming retirement system an at-will contract employee of a member employer may be enrolled in the system if that employee’s wages under the contract are reported on an Internal Revenue Service Form W-2 Wage and Tax Statement, provided the employee pays the total premium or contribution required;

Notwithstanding subdivision (III) of this subparagraph, if the employment contract so provides, an at-will, year-round, full-time brand inspection contract employee authorized to carry out the duties specified by W.S.

11-20-201

may be eligible for membership in the state employees’ and officials’ group insurance plan in accordance with W.S.

9-3-207

, and the state retirement system under W.S.

9-3-412

, provided the employee pays the total premium or total contribution required, or the portion of the premium or contribution, if any, the employment contract directs the employee to pay and the employee’s wages under the contract are reported on an Internal Revenue Service Form W-2 Wage and Tax Statement. Subject to the limitations of W.S.

9-3-412

(c), the Wyoming livestock board shall have sole discretion to determine the amount of the total premium or contribution to be paid by the employee and the amount to be paid by the board, if any. The amounts shall be stated in the employment contract. The time limitations provided in subdivision (V) of this subparagraph shall not apply to any employee under this subdivision;

An at-will contract shall be for a term not exceeding twenty-four (24) months subject to renewal of the contract at the end of the contract period and W.S. 9-2-1012(h);

No at-will employee contract position shall be created unless specifically authorized by legislation or approved by the governor. Any position approved by the governor shall be reported to the joint appropriations committee. Continued authorization of any at-will employee contract position created by the governor shall be subject to legislative review and approval pursuant to W.S. 9-2-1012(h).

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 129, § 2.

Administer all statewide training functions provided by the department;

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 55, § 3.

The state compensation plan shall, to the extent not otherwise provided by law, apply to all state executive branch employees except those employees of the University of Wyoming and community colleges. The compensation and classification plan shall be designed to attract and retain a sufficient quantity of quality employees with competitive compensation based on relevant labor markets for each class of employment. The plan shall be based upon principles of fairness and equity and be administered with sound fiscal discipline. The plan shall utilize both fixed and variable compensation as well as noncash reward and recognition programs. All variable compensation benefits under the plan, except as otherwise provided by law, shall be administered by the department as a separately designated and appropriated budget item. The plan shall consist of:

Current job descriptions. These shall describe job content including the nature and level of work performed, responsibilities, requirements to possess professional licenses, certifications or registrations, and assist in job evaluation and classification, pay comparisons with other entities, recruitment, selection and performance appraisal;

Job content and classification. This process shall formally assign positions to classifications and determine pay grades in one (1) or more pay systems based on an evaluation of the content of jobs using quantitative point factors. At a minimum, these factors shall include knowledge, experience, skill problem solving, accountability and working conditions. These factors and their weights shall be established by the human resources division and reflect the relative importance of job content to the state and to the appropriate local, regional, national market or a combination of these markets as determined by the division. Establishing the value of compensation shall be primarily based on establishing the appropriate market value of the job. For positions for which a market value cannot readily be identified, the value of compensation shall be based on a fair and defensible method. Total compensation, including base salary, benefits, lump sum payments, allowances and other variable elements of compensation shall be targeted at a competitive level when compared to the appropriate labor markets to allow the state to attract and retain the quality and quantity of employees needed to fulfill service commitments to its citizens. The human resources division shall periodically audit and update the system to ensure that it reflects current labor market conditions and shall review applicable department rules and regulations, or through assessing employee complaints analyze hiring difficulties and turnover statistics;

Pay data collection and analysis. Data collection shall be based on a defined and relevant labor market that is representative of public and private sector employers. The relevant labor market may be local, regional, national or a combination of these markets as determined by the division to best reflect the relative importance of a job to the state. Data analysis shall identify salary ranges for each pay grade with minimum and maximum dollar limits. The total compensation package for state employees shall be considered in the data collection and analysis;

Procedures to set and change individual pay rates consistent with subsection (c) of this section;

A performance appraisal system. This system shall measure performance in writing as objectively as possible. The system shall relate differences in performance levels and provide a means of employee advancement within classification pay grades. Evaluators shall be trained in performance appraisal prior to assessing the performance of any employee. Evaluators shall be required to attend continuing personnel evaluation education programs as deemed necessary by the human resources division. All employees subject to appraisal may respond to the appraisal of their performance in writing;

When a license, certification or registration is required to perform job duties it shall be included in the position job classification, job advertisement and announcement;

Data collected under this subsection shall be available to the legislature as needed.

The state compensation plan shall provide for the following procedures to establish and change individual pay rates:

Rates of pay shall be determined using knowledge, skills, abilities, experience, responsibilities, requirements to possess professional licenses, certifications or registrations, and labor market conditions giving consideration to salaries in the public and private sector in the relevant labor market as determined by the division. Rates of pay shall be based on a combination of achievement of performance objectives, recognition of differences in job content, acquisition and application of further knowledge, skills and abilities;

General pay increases shall be only those approved by the legislature;

Pay increases based on performance appraisals shall be approved consistent with the performance appraisal system;

Promotion pay increases may be approved when an employee moves to a higher job grade;

Longevity pay increases shall be approved at a rate of forty dollars ($40.00) per month for each five (5) years of service. Longevity pay increases shall not be considered as part of base pay;

Special pay increases may be approved by the governor using available funds.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 52, § 2.

Any employee who has been paid for accumulated vacation or sick leave upon separation and who is rehired within thirty-one (31) days after separation, shall fully reimburse all payments for accumulated vacation or sick leave within thirty-one (31) days after being rehired with all rights. Any person who fails to reimburse the state as herein required shall be terminated.

The human resources division shall establish and administer a program of position sharing subject to the following provisions:

The sharing of any position is subject to approval by the director or chief administrator of the agency;

Each employee shall work a portion, equal to the employee’s share of the full-time position, of the number of hours required for the full-time position being shared;

Each employee shall receive a portion, equal to the employee’s share of the full-time position, of the salary attributable to the full-time position being shared, according to the state classification and compensation plan;

Position sharing employees are entitled to a portion, equal to the employee’s share of the full-time position, of employee benefits accorded to full-time employees. Benefits which cannot be divided, such as participation in the state group health and life insurance programs, shall be accorded to position sharing employees on the same basis as full-time employees without division, but the state’s contribution to the insurance or other benefit programs shall be a portion, equal to the employee’s share of the full-time position, of the contribution for full-time employees.

The state shall, in accordance with rules promulgated by the human resources division and on behalf of any employee receiving temporary total disability benefits for an injury covered under the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act and sustained while acting within the scope of employment with the state, for two (2) calendar months following the month in which the injury occurred, pay the employer’s contributions to the state group health insurance plan, the state group life insurance plan and to the state retirement system. For the following four (4) calendar months the state shall pay both the employer’s and the employee’s contributions to the state group health insurance plan, the state group life insurance plan and the state retirement system. Payments under this subsection shall continue and the injured employee’s employment shall be considered continuous until the end of the sixth calendar month following the month in which the injury occurred, until the injured employee returns to work or is terminated or until the injured employee is no longer eligible to receive temporary total disability benefits, whichever first occurs.

In promulgating rules regarding layoffs due to reductions in force, the division shall require:

That each agency shall designate divisions within the agency for the purpose of reduction in force;

That no layoffs from a reduction in force shall occur within sixty (60) days of any designation under paragraph (i) of this subsection;

That layoffs due to a reduction in force shall occur within affected divisions designated under paragraph (i) of this subsection and that no employee affected by a reduction in force shall displace any other employee outside his designated division;

That designations under paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be made by the agency director and are not rules under W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

.

Designations under paragraph (h)(i) of this section:

Shall not be effective until approved by the governor;

Are not subject to contested case procedures or judicial review under W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 129, § 2.

A department director or commissioner appointed by the governor shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed by him as provided by W.S.

9-1-202

. If authorized by law or upon approval by the governor, a department director or commissioner may appoint a deputy department director, one (1) or more division administrators, or both, who shall serve at the pleasure of the director or commissioner and may be removed by him at any time without cause. Any person appointed under this subsection shall be covered under the executive compensation plan. This subsection is not applicable to the game and fish department.

In carrying out the duties of the division under this section, employment first shall be the policy of the state that competitive and integrated employment shall be considered its first option when serving persons with disabilities who are of working age to obtain employment. Employment first applies to programs and services that provide services and support to help obtain employment for persons with disabilities. All state agencies shall follow this policy and ensure that it is effectively implemented in their hiring and in all programs and services administered or funded by the agencies. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any employer to give preference to hiring people with a disability. All state agencies shall coordinate efforts and shall collaborate within and among the agencies to ensure that state programs, policies, procedures and funding support competitive and integrated employment of individuals with disabilities. All state agencies shall, whenever feasible, share data and information across systems in order to track progress toward full implementation of this subsection. Nothing in this section shall be construed as eliminating any supported employment services as an option when appropriate.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:74; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2026; Laws 1979, ch. 10, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 113, § 1; 1986, ch. 28, § 1; 1987, ch. 95, § 1; ch. 171, § 1; 1988, ch. 54, § 1; 1989, ch. 52, §§ 1, 2; ch. 223, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1992, ch. 71, § 1; 1993, ch. 80, § 1; ch. 183, § 1; 1994, ch. 15, §§ 321(o), 327; 1996, ch. 1, § 337; 1996, ch. 110, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 1998, ch. 24, § 1; ch. 30, § 303; ch. 32, § 1; ch. 98, § 1; 1999, ch. 33, § 1; 2000, ch. 29, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, § 3; 2007, ch. 152, § 1, ch. 205, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2009, ch. 129, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 85, § 1; 2014 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 57, § 1, effective February 19, 2019; 2020 ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-1022

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first
2007 amendment, by ch. 152, § 1, rewrote (b), to clarify job descriptions, responsibilities and requirements, and added (vi); rewrote (c) to clarify procedures for establishing and changing pay rates.

Laws 2007, ch. 152, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 205, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(xi)(F)(IV) inserted “total,” inserted “if any,” inserted the third sentence and in the fourth sentence, substituted “subdivision (V)” for “subparagraph (F)” and “subparagraph” for “paragraph.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in the section as set out above.

The 2008 amendment,

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(ii), substituted “consistent, equitable and flexible” for “uniform and consistent” and deleted “specifying the minimum, intermediate and maximum levels of pay for positions within each classification” from the end; in (a)(vi), inserted “a sufficient quantity of” preceding “suitable and qualified employees” and added “as needed to fulfill service commitments to its citizens” at the end; in (a)(xi)(A), deleted “and the system of service ratings” from the end; in (a)(xi)(D), deleted “two (2)” preceding “employees” and deleted “one (1) position or three (3) employees may share two (2)” preceding “positions”; repealed the former (a)(xi)(E), which read: “Necessary to administer a program whereby contract employees may be utilized by agencies to meet programmatic needs until July 1, 1996”; repealed the former (a)(xii), which read: “Establish a program whereby two (2) employees may voluntarily share one (1) classified position or three (3) employees may voluntarily share two (2) positions subject to the provisions of subsection (f) of this section”; in (b), deleted “current” preceding “state compensation plan” in the first sentence, added the second, third and fourth sentences, and substituted “The plan shall consist of” for “It shall consist of” in the last sentence; in (b)(i), inserted “job content including” following “These shall describe”; in (b)(ii), substituted “Job content” for “Job evaluation” in the first sentence, substituted “knowledge, experience, skill, problem solving, accountability” for “skill, effort, responsibility, including requirements to possess professional licenses, certifications or registrations” in the second sentence, added the provisions beginning with “and to the appropriate” and ending with “commitments to its citizens”, and substituted “audit and update the system to ensure that it reflects current labor market conditions” for “audit the system” in the last sentence; in (b)(iii), added the third sentence, deleted “midpoint” preceding “and maximum” in the fourth sentence, and added the last sentence; in (c)(i), added the provisions beginning with “in the relevant labor market”; in (c)(ii), deleted “Except as otherwise provided by law for the period commencing July 1, 1994 and ending June 30, 1998,” from the beginning; in (c)(iii), deleted “after July 1, 1990” following “shall be approved” and deleted “and appropriations for this purpose” from the end; in (c)(v), substituted “forty dollars ($40.00)” for “thirty dollars ($30.00)” in the first sentence and added the second sentence; in (c)(vi), deleted “appropriated in the personnel services category in the agencies' budgets or using the authority granted in 1988 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 89, Section 209” from the end; and repealed the former (k), which related to a pilot program for state employee bonuses.

Amendment effective September 1, 2010. —

Laws 2010, ch. 85 § 1, in (a)(xi)(F)(IV), inserted “Subject to the limitations of W.S. 9-3-412(c)” in the second sentence.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (n).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (a)(xi)(F)(V), added “and
W.S. 9-2-1012(h)” and added (a)(xi)(F)(VI).

The 2019 amendment,

in the introductory language of (b), substituted "plan shall, to the extent not otherwise provided by law, apply" for "plan shall apply" in the first sentence and substituted "the plan, except as otherwise provided by law, shall" for "the plan shall" in the fifth sentence.

Laws 2019, ch. 57 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Became law without signature February 19, 2019.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(xi)(F)(VI) deleted “as provided by W.S. 9-2-1005(b)” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “at the request of the state employee compensation commission” preceding “shall review” in the last sentence of (b)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (

l

) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this department.” —

For meaning of “department,” see § 9-2-1002(a)(ii).

Vacant position elimination. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 314, effective July 1, 2004, directs that during the period July 1, 2004, through June 30, 2006, any full or part time permanent position in any agency which has been vacant for a period of twenty-four (24) consecutive months is eliminated effective on the first day of the calendar month during which the position will have been vacant for twenty-four (24) consecutive months. All funds appropriated for such positions shall revert to the fund from which the appropriation was made.

Central position pool. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 316, effective July 1, 2004, provides: “A central position pool is created to be administered by the budget division, department of administration and information. The governor may transfer positions and funding from any agency to the pool and from the pool to any agency. Transfers to and from the pool shall be reported to the legislature through the department of administration and information B-11 process. In addition, the governor may transfer funds from the pool for contractual services by any agency.”

Hiring freeze. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 317, effective July 1, 2004, provides: “No legislative appropriations of general fund monies shall be used to hire new employees from July 1, 2004, through June 30, 2006, except to fill a vacancy within the authorized number of positions as indicated by the agency's appropriation act or otherwise specified by legislation enacted in the 2004 budget session or 2005 general and budget session. The governor may authorize additional positions in any agency, even if in excess of the positions authorized by the legislature, provided that at least an identical number of vacant positions existing in other agencies are terminated. The additional positions shall be funded using money authorized for the vacant positions.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 306(b), provides that, notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1022

, and for the period commencing July 1, 2004 and ending June 30, 2006, longevity pay increases under W.S.

9-2-1022

(c)(v) are to be paid at a rate of $40 per month for each five years of service as an executive branch employee of the state and appropriates $1,000,000 from the general fund to the state auditor for purposes of this subsection.

Jurisdiction. —

The constitution specifically recognizes and allows that jurisdiction may be vested in entities other than the district courts; therefore the district court's jurisdiction was not unconstitutionally limited where the legislature placed jurisdiction over state personnel matters with the Department of Administration and Information. Glover v. State, 860 P.2d 1169,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1993).

Exclusive jurisdiction. —

The state Department of Administration and Information possessed exclusive jurisdiction over state personnel matters such that employee who had been terminated was required to exhaust the administrative remedies before judicial review was available. Glover v. State, 860 P.2d 1169,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1993).

Primary jurisdiction. —

Because the exclusive jurisdiction over state personnel matters rested with the Department of Administration and Information until the available administrative remedies had been exhausted, primary jurisdiction was necessarily vested in the agency. Glover v. State, 860 P.2d 1169,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1993).

Stated

in

Wagoner v. State, Dep't of Admin. & Info., 924 P.2d 88,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, under federal constitution, of regulations, rules or statutes requiring random or mass drug testing of public employees or persons whose employment is regulated by state, local or federal government, 86 ALR Fed 420.

Supreme court's views on mandatory testing for drugs or alcohol, 145 ALR Fed 335.